Utah statutes.
78B-2-204.   Seizure or possession within seven years necessary.

An action for the recovery or possession of real property may not be maintained, unless it appears the plaintiff, his ancestor, grantor, or predecessor owned or possessed the property in question within seven years before the commencement of the action.

